Florida, session 2026, SB1740.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 63 64 Section 1.âParagraph (f) is added to subsection (2) of 65 section 561.221, Florida Statutes, to read: 66 561.221âLicensing of manufacturers and distributors as 67 vendors and of vendors as manufacturers; conditions and 68 limitations.â 69 (2) 70 (f)âA craft brewery licensed under this subsection may 71 conduct tastings and sales of malt beverages produced by the 72 brewery at fairs, trade shows, farmersâ markets, expositions, 73 and festivals in this state. The division shall issue permits to 74 such craft breweries for such tastings and sales. A craft 75 brewery must pay all entry fees and must have a brewery 76 representative present during the event. The permit is limited 77 to the duration and physical location of the event. 78 Section 2.âSection 561.37, Florida Statutes, is amended to 79 read: 80 561.37âBond for payment of taxes.âEach manufacturer and 81 each distributor shall file with the division a surety bond 82 acceptable to the division in the sum of $25,000 as surety for 83 the payment of all taxes, provided, however, that when in the 84 discretion of the division the amount of business done by the 85 manufacturer or distributor is of such volume that a bond of 86 less than $25,000 will be adequate to secure the payment of all 87 taxes assessed or authorized by the Beverage Law, the division 88 may accept a bond in a lesser sum than $25,000, but in no event 89 shall it accept a bond of less than $10,000, and it may at any 90 time in its discretion require any bond in an amount less than 91 $25,000 to be increased so as not to exceed $25,000; provided, 92 however, that the amount of bond required for a brewer shall be 93 $20,000, except that where, in the discretion of the division, 94 the amount of business done by the brewer is of such volume that 95 a bond of less than $20,000 will be adequate to secure the 96 payment of all taxes assessed or authorized by the Beverage Law, 97 the division may accept a bond in a lesser sum than $20,000, but 98 in no event shall it accept a bond of less than $10,000, and it 99 may at any time in its discretion require any bond in an amount 100 less than $20,000 to be increased so as not to exceed $20,000; 101 provided further that the amount of the bond required for a wine 102 or wine and cordial manufacturer shall be $5,000, except that, 103 in the case of a manufacturer engaged solely in the experimental 104 manufacture of wines and cordials from Florida products, where 105 in the discretion of the division the amount of business done by 106 such manufacturer is of such volume that a bond of less than 107 $5,000 will be adequate to secure the payment of all taxes 108 assessed or authorized by the Beverage Law, the division may 109 accept a bond in a lesser sum than $5,000, but in no event shall 110 it accept a bond of less than $1,000 and it may at any time in 111 its discretion require a bond in an amount less than $5,000 to 112 be increased so as not to exceed $5,000; provided, further, that 113 the amount of bond required for a distributor who sells only 114 beverages containing not more than 4.007 percent of alcohol by 115 volume, in counties where the sale of intoxicating liquors, 116 wines, and beers is prohibited, and to distributors who sell 117 only beverages containing not more than 17.259 percent of 118 alcohol by volume and wines regardless of alcoholic content, in 119 counties where the sale of intoxicating liquors, wines, and 120 beers is permitted, shall file with the division a surety bond 121 acceptable to the division in the sum of $25,000, as surety for 122 the payment of all taxes; provided, however, that where in the 123 discretion of the division the amount of business done by such 124 distributor is of such volume that a bond of less than $25,000 125 will be adequate to secure the payment of all taxes assessed or 126 authorized by the Beverage Law the division may accept a bond in 127 a less sum than $25,000 but in no event shall it accept a bond 128 less than $1,000 and it may at any time in its discretion 129 require any bond in an amount less than $25,000 to be increased 130 so as not to exceed $25,000; provided, further, that the amount 131 of bond required for a distributor in a county having a 132 population of 15,000 or less who procures a license by which his 133 or her sales are restricted to distributors and vendors who have 134 obtained licenses in the same county, shall be $5,000. 135 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 563.02, Florida 136 Statutes, is amended to read: 137 563.02âLicense fees; vendors; manufacturers and 138 distributors.â 139 (2)âEach manufacturer engaged in the business of brewing 140 only malt beverages shall pay an annual state license tax of 141 $3,000 for each plant or branch he or she may operate. However, 142 each manufacturer engaged in the business of brewing fewer less 143 than 60,000 10,000 kegs of malt beverages annually pursuant to 144 s. 561.221(2) or for consumption on the premises pursuant to s. 145 561.221(3) shall pay an annual state license tax of $500 for 146 each plant or branch. 147 Section 4.âSection 563.042, Florida Statutes, is created to 148 read: 149 563.042âContract brewing and alternating proprietorships.â 150 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 151 (a)ââAlternating proprietorship brewingâ means an agreement 152 between a host brewer and a guest brewer wherein the guest 153 brewer manufactures malt beverages on the host brewerâs licensed 154 premises. 155 (b)ââContract brewerâ means a licensed manufacturer of malt 156 beverages which brews such beverages on its licensed premises 157 for a contracting brewer. 158 (c)ââContract brewingâ means an agreement between a 159 contract brewer and a contracting brewer wherein the contract 160 brewer brews malt beverages on its licensed premises for a 161 contracting brewer. 162 (d)ââContracting brewerâ means a licensed manufacturer of 163 malt beverages which contracts for the services of malt beverage 164 brewing with a contract brewer. 165 (e)ââGuest brewerâ means a licensed manufacturer of malt 166 beverages which brews malt beverages at a host brewerâs licensed 167 premises. 168 (f)ââHost brewerâ means a licensed manufacturer of malt 169 beverages which allows a guest brewer to brew malt beverages at 170 the host brewerâs licensed premises. 171 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of the Beverage 172 Law, contract brewers are authorized to transfer malt beverages 173 to contracting brewers in an amount up to the yearly production 174 amount at a contracting brewerâs facility pursuant to a contract 175 brewing agreement entered into in accordance with this section. 176 Such beverages may be transferred to the contracting brewerâs 177 licensed facility as provided in s. 563.022(14)(d). 178 (3)âA contract brewer may contract with one or more 179 contracting brewers for the purpose of manufacturing malt 180 beverages for the contract brewer. The contract brewer is 181 responsible for complying with federal and state law relating to 182 the manufacturing of malt beverages, including labeling laws, 183 and for the payment of all federal and state taxes on any malt 184 beverages manufactured pursuant to this section after removing 185 the malt beverages from the manufacturerâs licensed premises. 186 Title to the malt beverages remains with the contract brewer 187 until the malt beverages are removed from the licensed premises. 188 (4)âEach entity engaged in the activities described in this 189 section shall maintain records, including the agreement 190 authorizing the manufacturing and transfer of malt beverages, 191 records of the amount of malt beverages manufactured as part of 192 the agreement, and all other records required by the division to 193 ensure compliance with the Beverage Law. 194 (5)âLicensed manufacturers of malt beverages intending to 195 engage in contract brewing must do all of the following: 196 (a)âNotify the division of their intent to operate as a 197 contract brewer or contracting brewer before engaging in 198 contract brewing and disclose the location of licensed premises 199 where brewing will occur on forms provided by the division. 200 Contracting brewers may engage in the manufacture of malt 201 beverages only at their duly licensed premises and at the 202 disclosed licensed premises of a contract brewer. 203 (b)âMake a full and complete report to the division by the 204 10th day of each month. Contract brewers shall report the volume 205 of a label of malt beverages manufactured upon the licensed 206 premises. Contracting brewers shall report the volume of a label 207 of malt beverages manufactured at the licensed premises of the 208 contract brewer. 209 (c)âMaintain all records required to be kept by 210 manufacturers of malt beverages under the Beverage Law. 211 (6)âBefore engaging in alternating proprietorship brewing, 212 an entity seeking to become a host brewer or a guest brewer must 213 qualify as a brewer with the National Revenue Center within the 214 United States Department of the Treasury and submit the 215 following information to the division on a form approved by the 216 division: 217 (a)âThe name of the host brewer. 218 (b)âThe name of the guest brewer. 219 (c)âThe location where the alternating proprietorship 220 brewing will take place. 221 (d)âThe location where any product brewed pursuant to the 222 alternating proprietorship brewing arrangement will be stored. 223 (e)âThe amount of malt beverages to be produced under the 224 alternating proprietorship brewing agreement. 225 (f)âThe timeframe in which the guest brewer will be 226 manufacturing malt beverages on the host brewerâs licensed 227 premises. 228 (g)âProof of occupancy rights to the host brewerâs licensed 229 premises for the duration of the alternating proprietorship 230 brewing agreement. 231 (h)âAny other information reasonably deemed necessary by 232 the division to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the 233 people in this state and to ensure that all applicable taxes on 234 the malt beverages produced pursuant to an alternating 235 proprietorship brewing agreement are remitted to the state. 236 (7)âEach contracting brewerâs malt beverages must remain 237 separate and identifiable from the malt beverages of all other 238 tenants at the contract brewerâs licensed premises at all times. 239 (8)âEach guest brewer shall make a full and complete report 240 to the division by the 10th day of each month. Guest brewers 241 shall report the volume of each label of malt beverages 242 manufactured upon each licensed premise. Host brewers shall 243 report the volume of each label of malt beverages manufactured 244 at the licensed premise of the host brewer. 245 (9)âThe guest brewer is responsible for complying with all 246 federal and state laws dealing with the manufacturing of malt 247 beverages, including labeling laws, and for the payment of all 248 federal and state taxes on any malt beverage manufactured 249 pursuant to this section upon removal of the malt beverage from 250 the manufacturerâs licensed premises. Title to the malt 251 beverages remains with the guest brewer. 252 (10)âManufacturers or vendors licensed pursuant to s. 253 561.221(3) may not engage in contract brewing or alternating 254 proprietorship brewing. 255 (11)âThe division may adopt rules and forms pursuant to ss. 256 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this section. 257 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 258 made by this act to section 561.221, Florida Statutes, in a 259 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 260 563.06, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 261 563.06âMalt beverages; imprint on individual container; 262 size of containers; exemptions.â 263 (7)âNotwithstanding any other provision of the Beverage 264 Law, a malt beverage may be packaged in a growler, which is an 265 individual container that holds 32, 64, or 128 ounces of such 266 malt beverage if it is filled at the point of sale. 267 (a)âA growler may be filled or refilled by any of the 268 following: 269 1.âA licensed manufacturer of malt beverages holding a 270 vendorâs license under s. 561.221(2). 271 2.âA vendor holding a quota license under s. 561.20(1) or 272 s. 565.02(1)(a) which authorizes the sale of malt beverages. 273 3.âA vendor holding a license under s. 563.02(1)(b)-(f), s. 274 564.02(1)(b)-(f), or s. 565.02(1)(b)-(f), unless such license 275 restricts the sale of malt beverages to sale for consumption 276 only on the premises of such vendor. 277 4.âA vendor holding a license pursuant to s. 563.02(1)(a) 278 or s. 564.02(1)(a), having held that license in current, active 279 status on June 30, 2015, subject to the following requirements: 280 a.âThe vendor proves, to the satisfaction of the division, 281 that the vendor had draft equipment and tapping accessories 282 installed and had purchased kegs before June 30, 2015. 283 b.âThe growlers are filled or refilled by the vendor or the 284 vendorâs employee aged 18 or older. 285 c.âThe taps or mechanisms used to fill or refill the 286 growlers are not accessible to customers. 287 d.âThe growlers meet the labeling and sealing requirements 288 of paragraph (b). 289 e.âThe vendor does not permit consumption on premises, 290 including tastings or other sampling activities. 291 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 292 made by this act to section 561.221, Florida Statutes, in a 293 reference thereto, section 563.13, Florida Statutes, is 294 reenacted to read: 295 563.13âFlorida brewery directional signs; fees.âUpon the 296 request of a brewery licensed under s. 561.221(2) or (3) which 297 produces a minimum of 2,500 barrels per year on the premises, is 298 open to the public at least 30 hours per week, and is available 299 for tours, the Department of Transportation shall install 300 directional signs for the brewery on the rights-of-way of 301 interstate highways and primary and secondary roads in 302 accordance with Floridaâs Highway Guide Sign Program as provided 303 in chapter 14-51, Florida Administrative Code. A brewery 304 licensed in this state which requests placement of a directional 305 sign through the departmentâs permit process shall pay all 306 associated costs. 307 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.